Nebraska, session 109, LB1012.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1012 LB1012
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 52-401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
52-401 (1) Whenever any person employs a physician, nurse,
chiropractor, physical therapist, hospital, or provider of emergency
medical service to perform professional services of any nature, in the
treatment of or in connection with an injury, and such injured person
claims damages from the party causing the injury, such physician, nurse,
chiropractor, physical therapist, hospital, or provider of emergency
medical service, shall have a lien upon any sum awarded the injured
person in judgment or obtained by settlement or compromise on the amount
due for the usual and customary charges of such physician, nurse,
chiropractor, physical therapist, hospital, or provider of emergency
medical service applicable at the time services are performed, except
that no such lien shall be valid against anyone covered under the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act. For persons covered under private
medical insurance or another private health benefit plan, the amount of
the lien shall be reduced by the contracted discount or other limitation
which would have been applied had the claim been submitted for
reimbursement to the medical insurer or administrator of such other
health benefit plan. The measure of damages for medical expenses in
personal injury claims shall be the private party rate, not the
discounted amount.
(2) In order to prosecute such lien, it shall be necessary for such
physician, nurse, chiropractor, physical therapist, hospital, or provider
of emergency medical service to serve a written notice upon the person or
corporation from whom damages are claimed that such physician, nurse,
chiropractor, physical therapist, hospital, or provider of emergency
medical service claims a lien for such services and stating the amount
due and the nature of such services, except that whenever an action is
pending in court for the recovery of such damages, it shall be sufficient
to file the notice of such lien in the pending action.
-2-

LB1012 LB1012
2026 2026
(3) A physician, nurse, chiropractor, physical therapist, hospital,
or provider of emergency medical service claiming a lien under this
section shall not be liable for attorney's fees and costs incurred by the
injured person in securing the judgment, settlement, or compromise, but
the lien of the injured person's attorney shall have precedence over the
lien created by this section.
(4) Upon a written request and with the injured person's consent, a
lienholder shall provide medical records, answers to interrogatories,
depositions, or any expert medical testimony related to the recovery of
damages within its custody and control at a reasonable charge to the
injured person.
(5) For purposes of this section, provider of emergency medical
service means a public entity that provides emergency medical service as
defined in section 38-1207.
Sec. 2. Original section 52-401, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-